Utah statutes.
59-18-113.   Application of chapter to trusts and trust assets established
or acquired before or after effective date.
Except as specifically provided in the trust, the provisions of this chapter
apply to any trust established before or after the effective date of this
chapter and to any trust asset acquired by the trustee before or after the
effective date of this chapter.
